apertium-kat.kat.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Georgian

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;


LEXICON RegNounInfl

%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ებ # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ი # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<%nom%>:%>ები # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot

სახლ RegNounInfl ; ! A noun



! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
